North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 8. Fees of Witnesses.

§ 6-51.
Not entitled to fees in advance.

Witnesses are not entitled to receive their fees in advance; but no witness in a civil action or special proceeding, unless summoned on behalf of the State or a municipal corporation, shall be compelled to attend more than one day, if the party by or for whom he was summoned shall, after one day’s attendance, on request and presentation of a certificate, fail or refuse to pay what then may be due for traveling to the place of examination and for the number of days of attendance.

History.

1868-9, c. 279, subch. 11, s. 3; Code, s. 1368; Rev., s. 1298; C.S., s. 1273.

Cross References.

As to attendance of witnesses, see

G.S. 8-63

.

§ 6-52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-53.
Witness to prove attendance; action for fees.

Every person summoned, who shall attend as a witness in any suit, shall, before the clerk of the court, or before the referee or officer taking the testimony, ascertain by his own oath or affirmation the sum due for traveling to and from court, attendance and ferriage, which shall be certified by the clerk; and on failure of the party, at whose instance such witness was summoned (witnesses for the State and municipal corporations excepted), to pay the same previous to the departure of the witness from court, such witness may at any time sue for and recover the same from the party summoning him; and the certificate of the clerk shall be sufficient evidence of the debt.

History.

1777, c. 115, s. 46, P.R; 1796, c. 458, P.R; R.C., c. 31, s. 73; 1868-9, c. 279, subch. 11, ss. 2, 4; Code, s. 1369; Rev., s. 1299; C.S., s. 1274; 1971, c. 269, s. 12.

Cross References.

As to attendance of witnesses generally, see

G.S. 8-59

.

§§ 6-54 through 6-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1947, c. 781.

§§ 6-58,
6-59.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-60.
No more than two witnesses may be subpoenaed to prove single material fact; liability for fees of such witnesses; one fee for day’s attendance.

No district attorney shall direct that more than two witnesses be subpoenaed for the State to prove a single material fact, nor shall the State or defendant in any such prosecution be liable for the fees of more than two witnesses to prove a single material fact, unless the court, upon satisfactory reasons appearing, otherwise directs. And no witness subpoenaed in a criminal action shall be paid by the State for attendance in more than one case for any one day.

History.

1871-2, c. 186; 1879, c. 264; Code, s. 744; Rev., s. 1303; C.S., s. 1284; 1971, c. 269, s. 13; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 6-61.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-62.
District attorney to announce discharge of State’s witnesses.

It is the duty of all district attorneys prosecuting in the several courts, as each criminal prosecution is disposed of by trial, removal, continuance or otherwise, to call, in open court, and announce the discharge of witnesses for the State, either finally or otherwise as the disposition of the case may require.

History.

1879, c. 264; 1881, c. 312; Code, s. 746; Rev., s. 1305; C.S., s. 1286; 1935, c. 26; 1971, c. 269, s. 14; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to discharge of witnesses generally, see

G.S. 8-63

.

§ 6-63.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.